languagetool-language-modules/wa/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/wa/hunspell/wa_BE.aff
SFX r Y 53
SFX r 0 /s* î po:no is:m
SFX r 0 /s* eu po:no is:m
SFX r 0 /s* eur po:no is:m
SFX r es resse/s* [^cksu]es po:no is:f
SFX r ces çresse/s* ces po:no is:f
SFX r kes cresse/s* kes po:no is:f
SFX r es resse/s* [^g]ues po:no is:f
SFX r gues gresse/s* gues po:no is:f
SFX r es resse/s* [^s]ses po:no is:f
SFX r ses resse/s* sses po:no is:f
SFX r î resse/s* [^cklnru]î po:no is:f
SFX r cî çresse/s* cî po:no is:f
SFX r kî cresse/s* kî po:no is:f
SFX r lî elresse/s* [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]lî po:no is:f
SFX r î resse/s* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]lî po:no is:f
SFX r clî kelresse/s* clî po:no is:f
SFX r çlî celresse/s* çlî po:no is:f
SFX r glî guelresse/s* glî po:no is:f
SFX r î resse/s* [^r]nî po:no is:f
SFX r î eyresse/s* rnî po:no is:f
SFX r î iresse/s* [^aeioôu]rî po:no is:f
SFX r î resse/s* [aeioôu]rî po:no is:f
SFX r î resse/s* [^g]uî po:no is:f
SFX r uî resse/s* guî po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [^ciklrsuy]eu po:no is:f
SFX r ceu çresse/s* ceu po:no is:f
SFX r ieu eyresse/s* ieu po:no is:f
SFX r keu cresse/s* keu po:no is:f
SFX r leu elresse/s* [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûçcg]leu po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]leu po:no is:f
SFX r cleu kelresse/s* cleu po:no is:f
SFX r çleu celresse/s* çleu po:no is:f
SFX r gleu guelresse/s* gleu po:no is:f
SFX r reu erresse/s* [^aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [aåâeéêèiîoôuûny]reu po:no is:f
SFX r seu resse/s* sseu po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [^s]seu po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [^g]ueu po:no is:f
SFX r ueu resse/s* gueu po:no is:f
SFX r iyeu eyresse/s* iyeu po:no is:f
SFX r eu resse/s* [^aåâeéêèiîôuû]yeu po:no is:f
SFX r 0 resse/s* [^eîlrsu] po:no is:f
SFX r e resse/s* [^cu]e po:no is:f
SFX r ue resse/s* gue po:no is:f
SFX r ce çresse/s* ce po:no is:f
SFX r eur oresse/s* [^cku]eur po:no is:f
SFX r ceur çoresse/s* ceur po:no is:f
SFX r keur coresse/s* keur po:no is:f
SFX r eur oresse/s* [^g]ueur po:no is:f
SFX r ueur oresse/s* gueur po:no is:f
SFX r 0 resse/s* er po:no is:f
SFX r 0 iresse/s* [^eu]r po:no is:f
SFX r 0 iresse/s* l po:no is:f


SFX l Y 3
SFX l   ci cial ci
SFX l   ci chal ci
SFX l   ci la ci


SFX S Y 4
SFX S 0 "-t" [aåâeéêèiîoôuû] # a-t i schouté?
SFX S 0 "-st" [^s][^t] # dj' a-st aresté
SFX S 0 "-z" .
SFX S 0 "-n" ^e

SFX A Y 48 
SFX A 0 ans [^k] is:bdjA is:pr. is:1pl
SFX A k cans k is:bdjA is:pr. is:1pl
SFX A 0 èt [^ç] is:bdjA is:pr. is:3pl sp:E
SFX A ç cèt ç is:bdjA is:pr. is:3pl sp:E
SFX A 0 a [^k] is:bdjA is:er. is:1sg is:3sg
SFX A k ca k is:bdjA is:er. is:1sg is:3sg
SFX A 0 as [^k] is:bdjA is:er. is:2sg
SFX A k cas k is:bdjA is:er. is:2sg
SFX A 0 ass [^k] is:bdjA is:er. is:2sg is:dem.
SFX A k cass k is:bdjA is:er. is:2sg is:dem.
SFX A 0 îs [^çi] is:bdjA is:er. is:1pl
SFX A ç cîs ç is:bdjA is:er. is:1pl
SFX A i yîs [^u]i is:bdjA is:er. is:1pl
SFX A ui yîs gui is:bdjA is:er. is:1pl
SFX A 0 îz [^çi] is:bdjA is:er. is:2pl
SFX A ç cîz ç is:bdjA is:er. is:2pl
SFX A i yîz [^u]i is:bdjA is:er. is:2pl
SFX A ui yîz gui is:bdjA is:er. is:2pl
SFX A 0 ît [^çi] is:bdjA is:er. is:3pl
SFX A ç cît ç is:bdjA is:er. is:3pl
SFX A i yît [^u]i is:bdjA is:er. is:3pl
SFX A ui yît gui is:bdjA is:er. is:3pl
SFX A 0 éns [^ç] is:bdjA is:er.d. is:1pl
SFX A ç céns ç is:bdjA is:er.d. is:1pl
SFX A 0 îz [^çi] is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2pl
SFX A ç cîz ç is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2pl
SFX A i yîz [^u]i is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2pl
SFX A ui yîz gui is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2pl
SFX A 0 ént [^ç] is:bdjA is:er.d. is:3pl
SFX A ç cént ç is:bdjA is:er.d. is:3pl
SFX A 0 anxhe [^k] is:bdjA is:su.pr. is:1pl
SFX A k canxhe k is:bdjA is:su.pr. is:1pl
SFX A 0 exhe [^ç] is:bdjA is:su.pr is:3pl sp:E
SFX A ç cexhe ç is:bdjA is:su.pr is:3pl sp:E
SFX A 0 axhe [^k] is:bdjA is:su.d. is:1sg is:3sg
SFX A k caxhe k is:bdjA is:su.d. is:1sg is:3sg
SFX A 0 axhes [^k] is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2sg
SFX A k caxhes k is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2sg
SFX A 0 énxhe [^ç] is:bdjA is:su.d. is:1pl is:3sg
SFX A ç cénxhe ç is:bdjA is:su.d. is:1pl is:3sg
SFX A 0 îxhe [^çi] is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2pl
SFX A ç cîxhe ç is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2pl
SFX A i yîxhe [^u]i is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2pl
SFX A ui yîxhe gui is:bdjA is:su.d. is:2pl
SFX A 0 ans [^k] is:bdjA is:imper is:1pl
SFX A k cans k is:bdjA is:imper is:1pl
SFX A 0 ant [^k] is:bdjA is:p.d.
SFX A k cant k is:bdjA is:p.d.

SFX B Y 13 
SFX B 0 rè . is:bdjB is:fut. is:1sg is:3sg
SFX B 0 rès . is:bdjB is:fut. is:2sg
SFX B   0 ress . is:bdjB is:fut. is:2sg is:dem.
SFX B   0 rans . is:bdjB is:fut. is:1pl
SFX B   0 roz . is:bdjB is:fut. is:2pl
SFX B   0 ront . is:bdjB is:fut. is:3pl
SFX B 0 reu . is:bdjB is:cond. is:13sg
SFX B 0 reus . is:bdjB is:cond. is:2sg
SFX B 0 reuss . is:bdjB is:cond. is:2sg is:dem.
SFX B 0 reut . is:bdjB is:cond. is:3sg
SFX B  0 réns . is:bdjB is:cond. is:1pl
SFX B  0 rîz . is:bdjB is:cond. is:2pl
SFX B  0 rént . is:bdjB is:cond. is:3pl

SFX C Y 12 
SFX C 0 nut [^k] is:bdjC is:pr. is:3pl sp:O sp:C
SFX C k cnut k is:bdjC is:pr. is:3pl sp:O sp:C
SFX C 0 e [^çgs] is:bdjC is:su.pr is:1sg is:3sg
SFX C ç ce ç is:bdjC is:su.pr is:1sg is:3sg
SFX C 0 ue g is:bdjC is:su.pr is:1sg is:3sg
SFX C 0 se g is:bdjC is:su.pr is:1sg is:3sg
SFX C 0 es [^çgs] is:bdjC is:su.pr is:2sg
SFX C ç ces ç is:bdjC is:su.pr is:2sg
SFX C 0 ues g is:bdjC is:su.pr is:2sg
SFX C 0 ses s is:bdjC is:su.pr is:2sg
SFX C 0 nuxhe [^k] is:bdjC is:su.pr is:3pl sp:O sp:C
SFX C k cnuxhe k is:bdjC is:su.pr is:3pl sp:O sp:C

SFX 1 Y 10
SFX 1 0 er . is:bdjA is:inf
SFX 1 0 ez . is:bdjA is:pr. is:2pl
SFX 1 0 ez . is:bdjA is:imper is:2pl
SFX 1 0 éve . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:1sg is:3sg 
SFX 1 0 éves . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2sg 
SFX 1 0 éxhe . is:bdjA is:su.pr is:3pl 
SFX 1 0 é . is:bdjA is:p.p.
SFX 1 0 /A* [^cu]
SFX 1 c ç/A* c
SFX 1 u /A* gu

SFX 2 Y 13
SFX 2 0 î . is:bdjA is:inf
SFX 2 0 îz . is:bdjA is:pr. is:2pl
SFX 2 0 îz . is:bdjA is:imper is:2pl
SFX 2 0 ive . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:1sg is:3sg 
SFX 2 0 ives . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2sg 
SFX 2 0 îxhe . is:bdjA is:su.pr is:3pl 
SFX 2 0 î . is:bdjA is:p.p.
SFX 2 0 /A* [^cuy]
SFX 2 c ç/A* c
SFX 2 u /A* gu
SFX 2 y i/A* [^aåâeéêègiîoôuû]y
SFX 2 0 /A* [aåâeéêèiîoôuû]y
SFX 2 y ui/A* gy

SFX 4 Y 8
SFX 4 xh 0 ixh is:bdjA is:inf
SFX 4 0 oz . is:bdjA is:pr. is:2pl
SFX 4 0 oz . is:bdjA is:imper is:2pl
SFX 4 0 eu . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:1sg
SFX 4 0 eus . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:2sg 
SFX 4 0 eut . is:bdjA is:er.d. is:3sg 
SFX 4 0 oxhe . is:bdjA is:su.pr is:3pl 
SFX 4 0 /A* .
